Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.230

Petition.

Thirty days before the hearing of any application under the provisions of this chapter, the applicant shall present and file in the court in which such application is to be heard a petition for the order mentioned, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant, setting forth the name and age of the alleged incompetent or disabled spouse or domestic partner; a description of the premises constituting the homestead; the value of the same; the county in which it is situated; such facts necessary to show that the nonpetitioning spouse or domestic partner is incompetent or disabled to the degree required under RCW 6.13.210; and such additional facts relating to the circumstances and necessities of the applicant and his or her family as he or she may rely upon in support of the petition.

[ 2008 c 6 s 639; 1987 c 442 s 223; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 6; 1895 c 64 s 28; RRS s 556. Formerly RCW 6.12.320.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.